South Dakota, session 2026, HB1071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-3A-13 be AMENDED:
32-3A-13. Each Except for a ten-year registration as provided in section 2 of this
Act, each registration and validation decal shall expire expires on the last day of the month
of the year for which it was issued.
The boat shall A boat must be registered in the same manner as a motor vehicles
vehicle pursuant to §§ 32-5-2.2 and 32-5-2.6. The registration may be renewed by the
owner and new validation decals obtained as provided in § 32-3A-4.
A ten-year registration expires on the last day of the month of issuance in the tenth
year and may be renewed for successive ten-year periods, if the owner continues to be
eligible pursuant to the requirements of section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-3A:
The owner of a boat that is transported exclusively on a trailer that is registered,
in this state, to the owner pursuant to § 32-5-8 may elect to register the boat for a period
of ten years.
In addition to and when satisfying the requirements of § 32-3A-4, the owner must
provide proof of registration of the trailer used to transport the boat and submit an
affidavit stating that the boat is transported exclusively on the trailer.
The owner must pay a fee set by the commission, as authorized in § 32-3A-4, only
when applying for or renewing a ten-year registration.
Upon approval of the application, the county treasurer must issue to the owner a
registration certificate and decals in the same manner as prescribed in § 32-3A-5, except
that the decals must be marked to reflect the ten-year registration, with the month and
year of expiration listed.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.503.9 2 1071
If, during the ten-year registration period, the trailer is no longer registered to the
owner, the boat registration converts to an annual registration pursuant to § 32-3A-13
and expires on:
(1)_ The expiration date listed on the registration certificate and decals, if less than one
year remains in the ten-year registration period; or
(2) December thirty-first of the year in which the trailer was last registered to the
owner, if the time remaining in the ten-year registration period is one year or more.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.